Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 6 Railroad Companies

39-6-1.
“Railroad” defined.

The word “railroad,” as used in chapters 6 — 9 of this title, except in §

39-6-15

and in §

39-9-11

, shall be construed so as to include all so-called tramways and all other railroads operated by steam or other power.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-1

.

39-6-2.
Unlicensed road as nuisance.

Every railroad or portion of a railroad built in this state for public use, by itself or in connection with any other railroad, without charter or license first had and obtained from the general assembly, is declared to be a public nuisance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 40; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-2

.

39-6-3.
Action to abate unlicensed road.

In addition to the remedy by indictment for the nuisance, the attorney general shall, for the purpose of abating any nuisance, file on the part of the state, in the superior court, a civil action or information against any person or corporation who or that shall build any railroad or portion of a railroad, and the court shall take jurisdiction of, hear, determine, decree, and proceed thereon as in cases of private nuisance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 41; C.P.A. 1905, § 1220; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-3

.

39-6-4.
Supervision by president and directors.

The president and directors of every railroad corporation shall maintain, by themselves or by an executive committee of the directors, a watchful supervision over the management of their road.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-4

.

39-6-5.
Stockholders’ access to books.

Every stockholder of any railroad corporation incorporated within this state may, at all reasonable times, examine the books, papers, and accounts of the corporation in which he or she is a stockholder; and if any clerk or other officer of any railroad corporation having the custody of the books, papers, and accounts of the corporation, shall refuse to permit any stockholder of the corporation to inspect the books, papers, and accounts thereof, the person so offending shall forfeit one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 39; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-5

.

39-6-6.
Security for damages required before entry on land.

No railroad corporation shall enter upon or use the land or materials located for the use of its railroad, except for the purpose of making surveys, until the corporation shall have given such security for the payment of all damages as shall be finally awarded for the land or materials, and for costs, as shall be required by the commissioners appointed to estimate damages; nor shall the corporation enter upon or use the land or materials unless, before the assessment by the commissioners, notice that security will be given on request in writing to the commissioners shall be served on all known persons interested in the land and materials, and residing within this state, by delivering to them or by leaving at their last and usual places of abode a written statement as provided in this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 54; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 58; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 49; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-7.
Abandonment of condemned lands.

Any railroad corporation chartered by the general assembly of this state may, at any time before final court confirmation of the report of the commissioners appointed by any court, under the provisions of its charter and of law, to estimate all damages that any person shall sustain whose lands are mentioned or described in any location of the whole or any part of its railroad, abandon the whole or any part of the location, and may report the abandonment to the court; and thereupon all further proceedings by the commissioners with reference to so much of the location as shall have been so abandoned shall forthwith cease, and all costs and expenses incurred in the proceedings up to the date of the abandonment with reference to the abandoned location shall be paid by the railroad company, and the court shall make all necessary orders in the premises.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 55; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 59; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 50; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 50; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-7

; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 11.

39-6-8.
Reversion of abandoned lands.

Any and all lands, materials, and their appurtenances, covered by an abandoned location, that may have been taken or used and not paid for by the railroad company before abandonment, shall immediately, on the report thereof to such court as provided in §

39-6-7

, revert to, and the title thereof become revested in, the several owners thereof, and their respective heirs and assigns, in the same way and with the same effect as if the location had never been made, and the abandonment and reverter may be pleaded by the railroad company in offset and diminution of damages, if any, in any action or proceeding to recover damages for the taking or use.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 56; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 60; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 51; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 51; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-8

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-9.
Possession of land adverse to railroad.

No length of possession, user, or occupancy of land belonging to a railroad corporation by an owner or occupier of adjoining land shall hereafter create any right in or to the land of the corporation in an adjoining owner or occupant or in any person claiming under him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 657, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 61; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 52; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 52; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-9

.

39-6-10.
Adverse possession by railroad.

No length of possession, user, or occupancy by a railroad corporation of land belonging to an adjoining owner shall hereafter create any right in or to adjoining land in the railroad corporation or in any person or corporation claiming under it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1899, ch. 657, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 62; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 53; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-10

.

39-6-11.
Citations in condemnation matters.

Upon the application in writing of any railroad company, or of any person whose interest may be affected by the doings of the company, to the superior court for the county in which the estate affected lies, for a hearing and determination of any matter or thing whereof the superior court has jurisdiction and cognizance relative to railroads by virtue of any act of incorporation, or the provisions of §

39-6-13

, the clerk shall cause a citation to issue thereon, addressed to the parties named in the application, and made returnable to the superior court in the county, which citation shall be served upon the adverse parties in the same manner as process in a civil action, and, upon the return and entry thereof, the matter shall proceed in all respects as a civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 60; C.P.A. 1905, § 1131; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 66; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 57; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 57; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-11

.

39-6-12.
Filing of location of road — Citation.

Whenever any railroad company shall locate its road or any part thereof, it may file the report of the location with the clerk of the superior court for the county in which the located road is situated, and may, in writing, request the action of the court thereon according to charter or general or special act, or the provisions of §

39-6-13

; and thereupon the clerk shall cause a citation to issue addressed to the parties named in the application, and made returnable to the superior court in the county, which citation shall be served upon the adverse parties in the same manner as process in a civil action, and, upon the return and entry thereof, the matter shall proceed in all respects as a civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 61; C.P.A. 1905, § 1131; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 67; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 58; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 58; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-12

.

39-6-13.
Superior court jurisdiction.

The superior court shall have the same power and jurisdiction over the cases referred to in §§

39-6-11

and

39-6-12

as the court of common pleas, or special courts of common pleas, or common pleas division of the supreme court, formerly had by charter or by general law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 62; C.P.A. 1905, § 1131; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 68; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 59; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-13

.

39-6-14.
Counsel fees in actions against railroads.

If any person having lawful claims upon any railroad corporation for overcharge for freight or passage, or for injury or loss of merchandise, or for damage by unlawful or unwarrantable delay in the transportation or delivery of merchandise, or for injury to the person, or for the refusal to transport or deliver persons or property, shall give written notice of the same, addressed to the president or treasurer or master of transportation of the corporation, and delivered to either of the officers or to any agent having charge of any depot of the corporation, fourteen (14) days previous to commencing suit for the same, and if the corporation neglects or refuses to pay the lawful claim, then the complainant, if he or she recovers more than the amount, if any, tendered by the corporation, shall also recover reasonable compensation for the services of his or her counsel, to be allowed by the court in addition to the actual damage; and if a less amount shall be recovered, then a reasonable allowance shall be made by the court for the services of the counsel of the corporation, to be taxed in addition to and to be allowed with the defendant’s costs as now taxed and allowed by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-14

; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 12.

39-6-15.
Power to operate aircraft.

Any railroad company incorporated under the laws of this state and operating a railroad in this state may acquire, own, maintain, and operate, either directly or through subsidiary corporations, aircraft for the transportation of passengers and property subject to provisions of all laws of this state relative to the operation of aircraft.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2049, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 111, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-15

.

39-6-16.
Conversion to electric power operation.

Railroad corporations that are subject to the provisions of this chapter, whose roads are now operated by power other than electricity, may operate or contract for the operation of their roads with electric power, in such manner and with such changes in their roadbed or tracks as they may find best adapted thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 400, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 69; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 60; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 60; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-16

.

39-6-17.
Operation of trains over tracks of another company.

Railroad corporations and street railroad companies may contract that either shall perform transportation of persons and property upon and over the whole or any part of the road of the other, so far as the other has then the right by law to perform the transportation, and may contract with each other for the lease, use, or sale of their respective roads, or any part thereof, upon such terms as the directors may agree, and as may be approved by a majority of the stockholders of both corporations present and voting at meetings called for that purpose, and the corporation operating any portion of any railroad under any contract or sale shall have, in addition to its own powers, privileges, and franchises, all the powers, privileges, and franchises of the other party thereto in respect to the road, and be subject to and perform all the public duties and obligations of the other party in respect thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 400, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 70; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 61; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 61; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-17

.

39-6-18.
Reduction of facilities by agreements — Filing of contracts.

The facilities for travel and business on either of the roads of any corporations acting under the provisions of §§

39-6-16

—

39-6-18

shall not be diminished by the terms or conditions of any agreement under this chapter, and copies of all contracts made under the provisions of the sections shall be filed with the division of public utilities and carriers within thirty (30) days after execution thereof, which shall set forth a full statement thereof in its next annual report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 400, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 71; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 62; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 62; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-18

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-19.
Sale of equipment with reserved title or lien — Lease with option to purchase.

In any contract for the sale of railroad or street railway equipment or rolling stock, it shall be lawful to agree that the title to the property sold, or contracted to be sold, although possession thereof may be delivered immediately or at any time or times subsequently, shall not vest in the purchaser until the purchase price shall be fully paid, or that the seller shall have and retain a lien thereon for the unpaid purchase money. In any contract for the leasing or hiring of property, it shall be lawful to stipulate for a conditional sale thereof at the termination of the contract, and that the rentals or amounts to be received under the contract may, as paid, be applied and treated as purchase money, and that the title to the property shall not vest in the lessee or bailee until the purchase price shall have been paid in full and until the terms of the contract shall have been fully performed, notwithstanding delivery to and possession by the lessee or bailee; provided, that no such contract shall be valid as against any subsequent judgment creditor, or any subsequent bona fide purchaser for value and without notice, unless:

The contract shall be evidenced by an instrument executed by the parties and duly acknowledged by the vendee or lessee or bailee, as the case may be, or duly proved, before some person authorized by law to take acknowledgment of deeds, and in the same manner as deeds are acknowledged or proved;

The instrument shall be filed for record in the office of the secretary of state;

Each locomotive engine or car so sold, leased, or hired, or contracted to be sold, leased, or hired, shall have the name of the vendor, lessor, or bailor plainly marked on each side thereof, followed by the word “Owner,” or “Lessor,” or “Bailor,” as the case may be.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 57; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 63; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-19

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-20.
Recording of contracts — Declaration of full payment or performance of conditions — Fees.

The contracts herein authorized shall be recorded by the secretary of state in a book of records to be kept for that purpose. And on payment in full of the purchase money, and the performance of the terms and conditions stipulated in any contract, a declaration in writing to that effect may be made by the vendor, lessor, or bailor, or his or her or its assignee, which declaration may be made on the margin of the record of the contract, duly attested, or it may be made by a separate instrument, to be acknowledged by the vendor, lessor, or bailor, or his or her or its assignee, and recorded as provided in this section. And for such services, the secretary of state shall be entitled to demand and retain for the use of the state the sum of fifty cents ($.50) for each one hundred (100) words recorded, for recording each of the contracts and each of the declarations, and a fee of fifty cents ($.50) for noting the declaration on the margin of the record.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 58; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 67; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-20

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-21.
Prior contracts for sale of equipment.

Sections

39-6-19

and

39-6-20

shall not be held to invalidate or affect in any way any contract made prior to February 21, 1893, of the kind referred to in §

39-6-19

, and any contract theretofore made may, upon compliance with the provisions of §§ 39-6-19 and

39-6-20

, be recorded as provided in § 39-6-20.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 59; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 65; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 56; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-21

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-22.
Liability of trustees and bondholders operating road.

Whenever any railroad corporation shall mortgage or convey in trust its railroad or railroad property, or any part thereof, to trustees, for the security of its bondholders or other creditors, or for the security of any class of bondholders or other creditors, and the trustees shall have taken possession of any railroad or railroad property, in pursuance of any authority contained in their mortgage or deed of trust, and shall take charge of and operate the railroad or railroad property for the benefit of the creditors for whom the trust was created, the trustees shall not, after the assent of the bondholders as hereinafter provided, be personally liable for any cause or injury arising from the operation of the road, or while they may operate the same, except for their willful mismanagement or for any contracts made by them as trustees; but all railroad property shall, the bondholders having assented thereto, be liable for the acts and proceedings of the trustees in the execution of their trusts, to the extent of the interest of the trustees of the bondholders or creditors, for whose benefit the trustees may act, and any action or other proceeding therefor shall be brought against the trustees, describing them as such.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 486, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-22

.

39-6-23.
Annual report by trustees.

Whenever any railroad corporation, the charter whereof requires the directors to make an annual report to the general assembly, shall have passed into the hands of trustees, the trustees, instead of the directors, shall make the report while the road remains in their hands, which report shall be approved by the division of public utilities and carriers, in like manner as if it had been made by the directors of the corporation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 53; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 57; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-23

.

39-6-24.
Redemption of franchise and property from sale on execution.

The franchise and property of a railroad corporation may be redeemed by it, or any mortgagee thereof, from sale on execution by paying or tendering to the purchaser the sum paid therefor at the sale, with interest, at any time within sixty (60) days after the final determination of any appeal to reverse the judgment upon which the execution issued, or of any suit to test the validity of the sale, brought before the sale or within sixty (60) days thereafter; but nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a sale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 177, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 213, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 63; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 63; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-24

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-25.
Rights and liabilities of purchaser at mortgage or judicial sale.

The purchaser of any railroad or street railway and of the property, rights, privileges, and franchises therewith connected, at a sale under a valid foreclosure of a legal mortgage thereof, or at a valid sale under the power of sale of the mortgage, or at a valid sale under the orders and directions of any court of competent jurisdiction, and the grantee and successors in title of any purchaser, shall be subject to all and the same duties, liabilities, restrictions, and other provisions respecting the railroad or street railway, or arising from the construction, maintenance, and operation thereof, and shall have all and the same powers and rights relating to the railroad or street railway, and the construction, maintenance, and operation thereof, which the corporation by which the mortgage was made, or which was the owner of the railroad or street railway at the time of the sale, was subject to and had at the time of the sale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 177, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 213, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 64; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 64; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-25

.

39-6-26.
Right of purchaser to convey to corporation.

Any purchaser of any railroad or street railway, and of any corresponding property, rights, privileges, and franchises, shall have the right and is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, assign, transfer, and convey all and each railroad or street railway and the property, rights, privileges, and franchises so purchased by him or her to any legally organized corporation duly created and empowered to construct, maintain, and operate a railroad or street railway, and to purchase, maintain, operate, and use any railroad or street railway, and the property, rights, privileges, and franchises, upon such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon between the purchaser and the corporation; and the person so selling any railroad or street railway and the property, rights, privileges, and franchises to the corporation, may receive in payment for the railroad or street railway the stock or bonds of the corporation at not less than the par value thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 177, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 213, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 65; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

39-6-26

.

39-6-27.
Safety, sanitation, and adequate shelter for railroad employees.

The public utilities administrator is hereby authorized to promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulations relating to safety, sanitation, and adequate shelter as affecting the welfare and health of railroad trainpersons, engine persons, yard persons, maintenance of way employees, highway crossing watchpersons, clerical, platform, freight house, express employees, station agents, and signal station operators.

In addition to any rules and regulations promulgated by the public utilities administrator as set forth in this section, the public utilities commission shall promulgate rules and regulations and provide for penalties for the violation thereof with respect to the installation of heaters and safety equipment on track motor vehicles or self-propelled equipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 179, § 1.

39-6-27.1.
Maintenance of way employees in area of double or multiple tracks.

Whenever maintenance of way crews or employees are working in the area of double or multiple railroad tracks, the following safety precautions shall be mandatory:

All trains shall be notified of the location of the crews or employees by mile markers or mile posts by train order.

All trains operating adjacent to such a work area shall reduce speed to freight train speed, not to exceed fifty miles per hour (50 m.p.h.).

One member of the crew shall be assigned as a flagperson to warn of approaching trains and shall be equipped with a radio, horn, and flag.

No work shall be conducted and all employees shall stand clear while a train is approaching, passing, and clearing a work area.

Failure by the railroad company to issue information by train order, which results in any violation of the above requirements, will subject the railroad company to a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation. The fine will be collected by the public utilities commission and remitted to the general fund of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 104, § 1.

39-6-27.2.
After accident counseling.

Every railroad corporation and railway company shall provide or make available to every member of an operating crew involved in an accident on its railway or right of way that results in loss of life or serious bodily injury, counseling services or other critical incident stress debriefing services within forty-eight (48) hours; provided, that the engineer, or other operating crew member involved in the accident shall be relieved from duty with compensation and applicable benefits at the site of the accident for a minimum of three (3) days; provided, further, that the leave may be without compensation and benefits if the railroad corporation makes the affirmative showing that the accident was due to negligence of an engineer or other operating crew member; provided, however, that any person who is otherwise eligible for these benefits and who has been found to have not acted negligently shall not be precluded from participation due to the negligence of a fellow crew member.

Any engineer returning to duty following such leave shall, if he or she so requests, be assigned an assistant engineer or other qualified person who shall accompany him or her for such time as may be necessary to guarantee the public safety, or until an appropriate medical practitioner has determined that the engineer does not suffer from post-traumatic stress disorder.

The administrator of the public utilities commission shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 458, § 1.

39-6-28.
[Reserved.]

39-6-29.
Caboose car or rider car.

It shall be unlawful for any corporation or individual to maintain, equip, or use within the state, any railroad caboose car, a rider car, or any car used as either a caboose car or rider car, unless the car is equipped with suitable and adequate water supply to provide for sanitary washing, toilet, and drinking facilities, and further, unless the interior of the car is illuminated by electric lights of sufficient candle power to enable employees working in the caboose or rider cars to perform their respective duties safely and without undue eye strain; provided, however, that any of the aforesaid car or cars that are operated or used exclusively between one hour after sunrise and one hour before sunset need not be equipped as provided in this section.

Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be considered a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 109.

39-6-30.
Protection of railroad employees.

As a condition of his or her approval of any abandonment of railroad facilities, not including a relocation by a carrier or carriers by railroad subject to the provisions of this title, the public utilities administrator shall require a fair and equitable arrangement to protect the interest of the railroad employees adversely affected who are not protected by a collective bargaining agreement in such an event, and he or she shall include in his or her orders of approval such terms and conditions for the protection of the employees as he or she deems to be fair and equitable and to be substantially equivalent to those then generally imposed by the Interstate Commerce Commission in abandonment proceedings brought before the commission; provided, however, that the conditions shall provide, as a minimum, that during the period of four (4) years from the effective date of the order, the transaction will not result in employees of the carrier or carriers by railroad affected by the order being in a worse position with respect to their employment, except that the protection afforded to any employee pursuant to this section shall not be required to continue for a longer period following the effective date of the order than the period during which the employee was in the employ of the carrier or carriers prior to the effective date of the order; and, provided further, that, notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the public utilities administrator may accept, as a fair and equitable arrangement for the protection of railroad employees affected by any order of the public utilities administrator issued under this section, an agreement pertaining to the protection of the interest of employees entered into by any carrier or carriers by railroad and the duly authorized representative or representatives of its or their employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 193, § 1.

39-6-31.
Declaration of policy regarding abandoned railroad property.

The general assembly finds and declares that the preservation of open spaces and the orderly control and development of unused or undeveloped land bears a substantial relationship to the public health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state. When a railroad is granted permission to abandon any rail line by the Interstate Commerce Commission and gives up use of the entire width of its right of way in that area, an opportunity is afforded for the establishment of a facility for another means of transportation or for a necessary public recreation or conservation area in the community land which was not theretofore readily available. Railroads, by reason of their statutory privilege of land acquisition by condemnation and statutory protection from acquisition of their land by condemnation, are a proper subject for a special statutory procedure for the disposition of their unused or undeveloped lands.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 9; P.L. 1992, ch. 331, § 1.

39-6-32.
Disposition of abandoned railroad property.

Whenever any railroad is granted permission to abandon any rail line by the Interstate Commerce Commission and ceases to be used by the railroad claiming title thereto, and within one year thereafter the head of any department, board, bureau, commission, or agency of the state government, hereinafter referred to as the acquiring authority, declares that in his or her opinion the acquisition thereof will be advantageous to the establishment, construction, development, betterment, or maintenance of any governmental facility, public work, public improvement, or public preserve, the acquiring authority shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered, within the limits of the appropriations available or that shall be made available therefor, with the approval of the governor, to acquire interests, estates, easements, and privileges in the right of way for public use, by purchase, lease, gift, or by proceedings pursuant to §

39-6-33

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 9; P.L. 1992, ch. 331, § 1.

39-6-33.
Determination of price to be paid.

If the railroad shall agree with the acquiring authority upon the sum to be paid, and the price shall be approved by the state properties committee, the sum agreed shall be paid to the railroad upon delivery of proper instruments of conveyance. If no agreement as to the price to be paid is reached within one year following the abandonment, then within six (6) months thereafter, or if the abandoned right of way has not been disposed of otherwise, then at any time thereafter, the acquiring authority may petition the superior court for one of the counties in which the land is situated for an assessment by a judge thereof of the fair value to be paid for the estate or interest in the land. A hearing on the petition shall be conducted as in other civil actions, and either party shall have the right to appeal the decision as provided by law. Within thirty (30) days after a final judgment is entered, the acquiring authority shall tender payment in accordance therewith to the railroad and receive proper instruments of conveyance. If the acquiring authority shall fail to make tender within the time allowed, the railroad shall be at liberty to dispose of the land or any estate or interest therein in any manner it shall see fit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 9.